Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Firearms Regulation

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d Weapons and Firearms § 32.

Validity and construction of gun control laws, 28 ALR3d 845.

Liability of one who provides, by sale or otherwise, firearm or ammunition to adult who shoots another, 39 ALR4th 517.

When has applicant for license under Gun Control Act of 1968 “willfully” violated statute or regulations within meaning of 18 USC § 923(d)(1)(C), 59 ALR Fed 254.

What constitutes actual or constructive possession of unregistered or otherwise prohibited firearm in violation of 26 USC § 5861, 133 ALR Fed 347.

94 C.J.S. Weapons §§ 3 to 8.

§§ 6-8-201 and 6-8-202.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 21, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3, related to the information required to be kept in a firearms register.

§ 6-8-203.
Firearms information to be kept in place of business; inspection by peace officer.

The information required by federal law to be maintained on firearms shall be kept by every wholesaler, retailer, pawnbroker and dealer in firearms in the place of business of the wholesaler, retailer, pawnbroker or dealer, and shall be subject to inspection by any peace officer at all reasonable times.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1997, ch. 21, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of state gun control legislation under state constitutional provisions securing the right to bear arms, 86 ALR4th 931.

§ 6-8-204.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 21, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3, related to the penalties for failure to comply with the firearm register requirements.